Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB47.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 531 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual extortion when he or she communicates, through any
means, a threat to injure the property or reputation of another person, commit
violence against another person, or distribute any matter depicting another
person engaged in sexual conduct or in a state of nudity or seminudity:
(a) With the intent to coerce that person to:
1. Engage in sexual conduct;
2. Produce, provide, or distribute any matter depicting that person in a
state of nudity or seminudity or engaging in sexual conduct;
3. Provide the payment of money, property, services, or any other thing
of value to the perpetrator; or
4. Do any act or refrain from doing any act against his or her will; or
(b) That causes that person to:
1. Engage in sexual conduct;
2. Produce, provide, or distribute any matter depicting that person in a
state of nudity or seminudity or engaging in sexual conduct;
3. Provide the payment of money, property, services, or any other thing
of value to the perpetrator; or
4. Do any act or refrain from doing any act against his or her will.
(2) (a) A violation of subsection (1)(a) of this section is punishable as a Class D
felony.
(b) A violation of subsection (1)(b) of this section is punishable as a Class C
felony.
(3) Any person who is convicted of a violation of this section shall be penalized one
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
(1) class more severely if:
(a) The person:
1. Was previously convicted of any offense under KRS Chapter 510 or a
sex crime as defined in Section 3 of this Act;
2. Occupied a position of special trust or a position of authority as those
terms are defined in KRS 532.045 in relation to the victim; or
3. Used or threatened the use of a deadly weapon or dangerous
instrument against the victim during the commission of the offense;
(b) The victim:
1. Is a minor;
2. Suffered physical injury during the commission of the offense; or
3. Attempted suicide resulting in serious physical injury or died by
suicide within ninety (90) days of the commission of the offense; or
(c) The offense was committed during the course of a kidnapping as described
in KRS 509.040.
(4) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Images involving voluntary nudity or sexual conduct in public, commercial
settings, or in a place where a person does not have a reasonable
expectation of privacy;
(b) Disclosures made in the public interest, including the reporting of unlawful
conduct, or lawful and common practices of law enforcement, criminal
reporting, corrections, legal proceedings, or medical treatment;
(c) Disclosures of materials that constitute a matter of public concern;
(d) When acting in its capacity as a provider of those services, a:
1. Broadband internet access service provider;
2. Telecommunications service provider, an interconnected VoIP service
provider, or a mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153;
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
3. Commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 332;
or
4. Cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 522; or
(e) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 230, related to
content provided by a user of the interactive computer service.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 411 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any person who violates Section 1 of this Act shall be personally liable for actual
and punitive damages, court costs, and reasonable attorney's fees in a civil cause
of action brought against an alleged perpetrator:
(a) By a victim or a victim's estate; or
(b) By a victim's parent or legal guardian on behalf of a victim who is a minor.
(2) The action may be filed in the Circuit Court of the county where the alleged
violation occurred or the county where the victim resides.
(3) An individual found liable under this section shall be jointly and severally liable
with each other person found liable under this section for the damages arising
from the same violation of this section.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability on:
(a) When acting in its capacity as a provider of those services, a:
1. Broadband internet access service provider;
2. Telecommunications service provider, an interconnected VoIP service
provider, or a mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 153;
3. Commercial mobile service provider as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 332;
or
4. Cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 522; or
(b) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. sec. 230, related to
content provided by a user of the interactive computer service.
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
Section 3. KRS 17.500 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 17.500 to 17.580:
(1) "Approved provider" means a mental health professional licensed or certified in
Kentucky whose scope of practice includes providing mental health treatment
services and who is approved by the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory
Board, under administrative regulations promulgated by the board, to provide
comprehensive sex offender presentence evaluations or treatment to adults and
youthful offenders, as defined in KRS 600.020;
(2) "Cabinet" means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(3) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, "criminal offense
against a victim who is a minor" means any of the following offenses if the
victim is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission of the
offense:
1. Kidnapping, as set forth in KRS 509.040, except by a parent;
2. Unlawful imprisonment, as set forth in KRS 509.020, except by a
parent;
3. Sex crime;
4. Promoting a sexual performance of a minor, as set forth in KRS
531.320;
5. Human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as set forth in
KRS 529.100;
6. Promoting human trafficking involving commercial sexual activity, as
set forth in KRS 529.110;
7. Promoting prostitution, as set forth in KRS 529.040, when the defendant
advances or profits from the prostitution of a person under the age of
eighteen (18);
8. Use of a minor in a sexual performance, as set forth in KRS 531.310;
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
9. Sexual abuse, as set forth in KRS 510.120 and 510.130;
10. Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree, as set forth in KRS
530.064(1)(a);
11. Any offense involving a minor or depictions of a minor, as set forth in
KRS Chapter 531;
12. Any attempt to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs
1. to 11. of this paragraph;
13. Solicitation to commit any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1.
to 11. of this paragraph; or
14. Any offense from another state or territory, any federal offense, or any
offense subject to a court martial of the United States Armed Forces,
which is similar to any of the offenses described in subparagraphs 1. to
13. of this paragraph.
(b) Conduct which is criminal only because of the age of the victim shall not be
considered a criminal offense against a victim who is a minor if the
perpetrator was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the commission
of the offense;
(4) "Law enforcement agency" means any lawfully organized investigative agency,
sheriff's office, police unit, or police force of federal, state, county, urban-county
government, charter county, city, consolidated local government, or a combination
of these, responsible for the detection of crime and the enforcement of the general
criminal federal or state laws;
(5) "Registrant" means:
(a) Any person eighteen (18) years of age or older at the time of the offense or
any youthful offender, as defined in KRS 600.020, who has committed:
1. A sex crime; or
2. A criminal offense against a victim who is a minor; or
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
(b) Any person required to register under KRS 17.510; or
(c) Any sexually violent predator; or
(d) Any person whose sexual offense has been diverted pursuant to KRS 533.250,
until the diversionary period is successfully completed;
(6) "Registrant information" means the name, including any lawful name change
together with the previous name, Social Security number, age, race, sex, date of
birth, height, weight, hair and eye color, fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample, a
photograph, aliases used, residence, motor vehicle operator's license number as well
as any other government-issued identification card numbers, if any, a brief
description of the crime or crimes committed, and other information the cabinet
determines, by administrative regulation, may be useful in the identification of
registrants;
(7) "Residence" means any place where a person sleeps. For the purposes of this
statute, a registrant may have more than one (1) residence. A registrant is required
to register each residence address;
(8) "Sex crime" means:
(a) A felony offense defined in KRS Chapter 510, KRS 529.100 or 529.110
involving commercial sexual activity, 530.020, 530.064(1)(a), 531.310,
531.320, 531.335, 531.340, 531.365, 531.366, 531.367, [or ]531.368, or
Section 1 of this Act;
(b) A felony attempt to commit a felony offense specified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
(c) A federal felony offense, a felony offense subject to a court-martial of the
United States Armed Forces, or a felony offense from another state or a
territory where the felony offense is similar to a felony offense specified in
paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(9) "Sexual offender" means any person convicted of, pleading guilty to, or entering an
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
Alford plea to a sex crime as defined in this section, as of the date the verdict is
entered by the court;
(10) "Sexually violent predator" means any person who has been subjected to
involuntary civil commitment as a sexually violent predator, or a similar
designation, under a state, territory, or federal statutory scheme;
(11) "The board" means the Sex Offender Risk Assessment Advisory Board created
under KRS 17.554;
(12) "Victim" has the same meaning as in KRS 421.500;
(13) "DNA sample" or "deoxyribonucleic acid sample" means a blood or swab specimen
from a person, as prescribed by administrative regulation, that is required to provide
a DNA sample pursuant to KRS 17.170 or 17.510, that shall be submitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for law enforcement
identification purposes and inclusion in law enforcement identification databases;
and
(14) "Authorized personnel" means an agent of state government who is properly trained
in DNA sample collection pursuant to administrative regulation.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The superintendent of each local school district shall require the principal of
each school within the district to provide written notice of the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act to students in grades six (6) and above and parents or
guardians of all students within ten (10) days of the first instructional day of each
school year.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to public charter
schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
(1) By August 1, 2025, local boards shall require each public secondary school to
display, in a prominent location in each school building, a legible printed sign in
English and Spanish at least eight and one-half (8.5) inches by eleven (11) inches
in size that shall contain:
(a) A description of sexual extortion consistent with the definition in Section 1
of this Act;
(b) Contact information for state or local law enforcement for reporting or
seeking assistance relating to sexual extortion;
(c) Contact information for federal law enforcement for reporting or seeking
assistance relating to sexual extortion;
(d) Contact information for a national suicide prevention hotline; and
(e) The Uniform Resource Locator (URL), a Quick Response (QR) code, or
similar resource to identify the website address for informational and
support resources regarding sexual extortion provided by the National
Center for Missing and Exploited Children or any federally funded
successor entity.
(2) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to public charter
schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(3) By July 15, 2025, the department shall publish recommendations for information
to be included consistent with subsection (1) of this section.
Section 6. KRS 164.2815 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Beginning August 1, 2020, ]Any student identification badge issued by a public or
private postsecondary education institution, vocational school, or any other
institution that offers a postsecondary degree, certificate, or licensure shall contain
the contact information for:
(a)[(1)] A national domestic violence hotline;
(b)[(2)] A national sexual assault hotline; and
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 8
(c)[(3)] A national suicide prevention hotline.
(2) Beginning August 1, 2025, a public or private postsecondary education
institution, vocational school, or any other institution that offers a postsecondary
degree, certificate, or licensure shall post in a prominent location in every
residential facility and buildings containing instructional spaces, student services,
and academic support services, a legible printed sign in English and Spanish at
least eight and one-half (8.5) inches by eleven (11) inches in size that shall
contain:
(a) A description of sexual extortion consistent with the definition in Section 1
of this Act;
(b) Contact information for state or local law enforcement for reporting or
seeking assistance relating to sexual extortion;
(c) Contact information for federal law enforcement for reporting or seeking
assistance relating to sexual extortion;
(d) Contact information for a national suicide prevention hotline; and
(e) The Uniform Resource Locator (URL), a Quick Response (QR) code, or
similar resource to identify the website address for informational and
support resources regarding sexual extortion provided by the National
Center for Missing and Exploited Children or any federally funded
successor entity.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 11/14/2024 4:11 PM Jacketed